it: Colore del bagliore: Ambra/arancione; Blu; Verde; Multicolore/selezionabile; Rosso; Bianco; Altro
bg-BG: Цвят на сигналния огън: Кехлибарен/оранжев; Син; Зелен; Многоцветен / избираем; Червен; Бял; Друго
de: Farbe der Signalrakete: Bernstein/Orange; Blau; Grün; Mehrfarbig / Wählbar; Rot; Weiß; Sonstige
pt-BR: Cor do sinalizador: Âmbar/Laranja; Azul; Verde; Multicolorido / selecionável; Vermelho; Branco; Outros
ko: 신호탄 색상: 주황색/오렌지색; 파란색; 녹색; 다색 / 선택 가능; 빨간색; 흰색; 기타
zh-TW: 信號光顏色: 琥珀色 / 橘色; 藍色; 綠色; 多色 / 可選擇; 紅色; 白色; 其他
lt-LT: Signalinės raketos spalva: Gintarinė / oranžinė; Mėlyna; Žalia; Daugiaspalvė / pasirenkama; Raudona; Balta; Kita
ru: Цвет сигнального огня: Янтарный/оранжевый; Синий; Зеленый; Многоцветный / на выбор; Красный; Белый; Другое
zh-CN: 闪光颜色: 琥珀色/橙色; 蓝色; 绿色; 多色/可选; 红色; 白色; 其他
fr: Couleur du signal de détresse: Ambre/orange; Bleu; Vert; Multicolore / sélectionnable; Rouge; Blanc; Autre
pt-PT: Flare cor: Âmbar/laranja; Azul; Verde; Multicolor / selecionável; Vermelho; Branco; Outro
hu: Fénylő szín: Borostyánsárga/narancssárga; Kék; Zöld; Többszínű / választható; Piros; Fehér; Egyéb
nl: Flare kleur: Amber/Oranje; Blauw; Groen; Meerkleurig / selecteerbaar; Rood; Wit; Overige
sk-SK: Rozšírená farba: Jantárová/oranžová; Modrá; Zelená; Viacfarebná/voliteľná; Červená; Biela; Iné
el: Χρώμα φωτοβολίδας: Κεχριμπαρί/Πορτοκαλί; Μπλε; Πράσινο; Πολύχρωμο / επιλέξιμο; Κόκκινο; Λευκό; Άλλο
pl: Kolor flary: Bursztynowy/pomarańczowy; Niebieski; Zielony; Wielokolorowy / do wyboru; Czerwony; Biały; Inny
cs: Barva světlice: Jantarová/oranžová; Modrá; Zelená; Vícebarevná/volitelná; Červená; Bílá; Jiné
sl-SI: Barva signalne rakete: Jantarna/oranžna; Modra; Zelena; Večbarvno / izbirno; Rdeča; Bela; Drugo
ro-RO: Culoarea semnalizatoarelor luminoase: Chihlimbar/Portocaliu; Albastru; Verde; Multicolor / selectabil; Roșu; Alb; Altele
fi: Hätäsoihdun väri: Meripihka/oranssi; Sininen; Vihreä; Monivärinen / valittavissa; Punainen; Valkoinen; Muu
da: Blusfarve: Rav/orange; Blå; Grøn; Flerfarvet/valgbar; Rød; Hvid; Andet
tr: İşaret fişeği rengi: Kehribar/Turuncu; Mavi; Yeşil; Çok renkli / seçilebilir; Kırmızı; Beyaz; Diğer
ja: フレア色: アンバー/オレンジ; 青; 緑; マルチカラー / 選択可能; 赤; 白; その他
es: Color de destello: Ámbar/naranja; Azul; Verde; Multicolor / seleccionable; Rojo; Blanco; Otro
hr-HR: Boja bljeska: Jantarna / narančasta; Plava; Zelena; Više boja / s odabirom; Crvena; Bijela; Ostalo
th: สีแฟลร์: เหลืองอำพัน/ส้ม; สีน้ำเงิน; สีเขียว; หลากสี / เลือกสีได้; สีแดง; สีขาว; อื่นๆ
sv: Blossfärg: Bärnsten/orange; Blå; Grön; Flerfärgad/valbar; Röd; Vit; Övrigt
en: Flare color: Amber/Orange; Blue; Green; Multi-color / selectable; Red; White; Other
vi: Màu sắc ánh sáng lóe lên: Hổ phách/Cam; Xanh dương; Xanh lá cây; Nhiều màu / có thể chọn; Đỏ; Trắng; Khác
nb: Flarefarge: Ravfarget / oransje; Blå; Grønn; Flerfarget / valgbar; Rød; Hvit; Annet